Alaska, session 34, SB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 14.03.120(d) is amended to read: 04 (d) Annually, before the date set by the district under (e) of this section, each 05 public school shall deliver to the department for posting on the department's Internet 06 website and provide, in a public meeting of parents, students, and community 07 members, a report on the school's performance and the performance of the school's 08 students. The report shall be prepared on a form prescribed by the department and 09 must include 10 (1) information on accreditation; 11 (2) results of norm-referenced achievement tests; 12 (3) results of state standards-based assessments in language arts and 13 mathematics; 14 (4) a description, including quantitative and qualitative measures, of 15 student, parent, community, and business involvement in student learning; 01 (5) a description of the school's attendance, retention, dropout, and 02 graduation rates as specified by the state board; 03 (6) the annual percent of enrollment change, regardless of reason, and 04 the annual percent of enrollment change due to student transfers into and out of the 05 school district; 06 (7) if Native language education is provided, a summary and 07 evaluation of the curriculum described in AS 14.30.420; 08 (8) the performance designation assigned the school under 09 AS 14.03.123 and the methodology used to assign the performance designation, 10 including the measures used and their relative weights; 11 (9) other information concerning school performance and the 12 performance of the school's students as required by the state board in regulation; 13 [AND] 14 (10) information on the number, attendance, and performance of 15 students enrolled in the school whose parents or guardians are on active duty in the 16 armed forces of the United States, the United States Coast Guard, the Alaska National 17 Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, or the Alaska State Defense Force; and 18 (11) a summary and evaluation of the curriculum used by the 19 school for the health and personal safety education program required under 20 AS 14.30.360(a), including 21 (A) the number of students in the school participating in 22 the program; 23 (B) the frequency with which the school teaches the 24 program; and 25 (C) the grades in which the program is taught. 26 * Sec. 2. AS 14.16.050(a) is amended to read: 27 (a) The following provisions apply with respect to the operation and 28 management of a state boarding school as if it were a school district: 29 (1) requirements relating to school district operations: 30 (A) AS 14.03.030 - 14.03.050 (defining the school term, day in 31 session, and school holidays); 01 (B) AS 14.03.083 - 14.03.140 (miscellaneous provisions 02 applicable to school district operations); 03 (C) regulations adopted by the board under authority of 04 AS 14.07.020(a) that are applicable to school districts and their schools, unless 05 the board specifically exempts state boarding schools from compliance with a 06 regulation; 07 (D) AS 14.12.150 (authorizing school districts to establish and 08 participate in the services of a regional resource center); 09 (E) AS 14.14.050 (imposing the requirement of an annual 10 audit); 11 (F) AS 14.14.110 (authorizing cooperation with other school 12 districts); 13 (G) AS 14.14.140(b) (establishing a prohibition on 14 employment of a relative of the chief school administrator); 15 (H) AS 14.18 (prohibiting discrimination based on sex in 16 public education); 17 (2) requirements relating to the public school funding program and the 18 receipt and expenditure of that funding: 19 (A) AS 14.17.500 (relating to student count estimates); 20 (B) AS 14.17.505 (relating to school operating fund balances); 21 (C) AS 14.17.500 - 14.17.910 (setting out the procedure for 22 payment of public school funding and imposing general requirements and 23 limits on money paid); 24 (3) requirements relating to teacher employment and retirement: 25 (A) AS 14.14.105 and 14.14.107 (relating to sick leave); 26 (B) AS 14.20.095 - 14.20.215 (relating to the employment and 27 tenure of teachers); 28 (C) AS 14.20.280 - 14.20.350 (relating to sabbatical leave 29 provisions for teachers); 30 (D) AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 (authorizing collective 31 bargaining by certificated employees), except with regard to teachers who are 01 administrators and except that the board may delegate some or all of its 02 responsibilities under those statutes; 03 (E) AS 14.25 (provisions regarding the teachers' retirement 04 system); 05 (4) requirements relating to students and educational programs: 06 (A) AS 14.30.180 - 14.30.350 (relating to educational services 07 for children with disabilities); 08 (B) AS 14.30.360 - 14.30.370 (establishing health and 09 personal safety education program standards); 10 (C) AS 14.30.400 - 14.30.410 (relating to bilingual and 11 bicultural education). 12 * Sec. 3. AS 14.30.360(a) is amended to read: 13 (a) Each district in the state public school system shall provide [BE 14 ENCOURAGED TO INITIATE AND CONDUCT] a program in health and personal 15 safety education for kindergarten through grade 12. The program must [SHOULD] 16 include instruction in physical health and personal safety, including alcohol and drug 17 abuse education, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), early cancer prevention and 18 detection, dental health, family health including infant care, environmental health, the 19 identification and prevention of child abuse, child abduction, neglect, sexual abuse, 20 and domestic violence, [AND] appropriate use of health services, and sexual health. 21 * Sec. 4. AS 14.30.360(b) is amended to read: 22 (b) The state board shall establish guidelines for the [A] health and personal 23 safety education program. Personal safety guidelines shall be developed in 24 consultation with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault. Upon 25 request, the Department of Education and Early Development, the Department of 26 Health, and the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault shall provide 27 technical assistance to school districts in the development of personal safety curricula. 28 A school health education specialist position shall be established and funded in the 29 department to coordinate the program statewide. Adequate funds to enable curriculum 30 and resource development, adequate consultation to school districts, and a program of 31 teacher training in health and personal safety education shall be provided. 01 * Sec. 5. AS 14.30.360(c) is amended to read: 02 (c) In addition to the health and personal safety education program 03 [ENCOURAGED UNDER (a) OF THIS SECTION], a school district shall establish 04 guidelines for schools in the district to provide opportunities during each full school 05 day for students in grades kindergarten through eight for a minimum of 90 percent of 06 the daily amount of physical activity recommended for children and adolescents in the 07 physical activity guidelines by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, United 08 States Department of Health and Human Services. The time provided for physical 09 activity under this subsection may include physical education classes and 10 opportunities for unstructured physical activity, such as recess. A school district shall 11 adopt guidelines under this subsection that 12 (1) allow a student to be excused from the physical activity 13 opportunities if the student is unable to participate for a medical reason; and 14 (2) provide an exemption from the physical activity opportunities 15 under this subsection for health and safety reasons, such as inclement weather. 16 * Sec. 6. AS 14.30.360 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 17 (e) The health and personal safety education program must include 18 comprehensive sexual health education based on a curriculum that 19 (1) instructs students on human development, sexuality, and 20 reproduction, including instruction on abstinence, anatomy and physiology, consent, 21 contraception, healthy relationships, and the prevention of pregnancy and sexually 22 transmitted diseases; 23 (2) is appropriate to a student's age and development; 24 (3) teaches medically and scientifically accurate information that is 25 verified or supported by the weight of research in compliance with accepted scientific 26 methods, that is published in peer-reviewed journals, as appropriate, and that is 27 recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations and agencies with 28 expertise in the field of sexual health; 29 (4) is consistent with the Future of Sex Education Initiative 2020 30 National Sex Education Standards: Core Content and Skills, K-12; 31 (5) teaches students abstinence as the most effective means of avoiding 01 sexually transmitted diseases and unintended pregnancy, but that also includes 02 materials and instruction on other forms of contraceptives and disease prevention; 03 (6) is inclusive of all students, regardless of gender, gender identity, 04 race, disability status, religion, or sexual orientation; and 05 (7) emphasizes that voluntary consent is required before sexual 06 activity; in this paragraph, "voluntary consent" means conscious and freely given 07 affirmative agreement to engage in sexual activity. 08 * Sec. 7. AS 14.30.370 is amended to read: 09 Sec. 14.30.370. Evaluation. Health and personal safety education programs 10 conducted under AS 14.30.360 shall be evaluated by the department in the same 11 manner as other curriculum programs are evaluated, except that the evaluation shall 12 also include changes in the health status of the pupils as determined by physical and 13 dental examinations conducted under AS 14.30.070. 14 * Sec. 8. AS 14.30.361 is repealed. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.